North Carolina, session 2025, HB967.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-132 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-132. Disorderly conduct in and injuries to public buildings and facilities.
(a) It is a misdemeanor if for any person shall:to do any of the following:
(1) Make any rude or riotous noise, or be guilty of engage in any disorderly
conduct, in or near any public building or facility; orfacility.
(2) Unlawfully write or scribble on, mark, deface, besmear, or injure the walls of
any public building or facility, or any statue or monument situated in any
public place; orplace.
(3) Commit any nuisance in or near any public building or facility.
(b) Any person in charge of any public building or facility owned or controlled by the
State, any subdivision of the State, or any other public agency shall have authority to arrest
summarily and without warrant for a violation of this section.
(c) The term "public building or facility" as used in this section includes any building or
facility together with the surrounding grounds and premises used in connection with the operation
or functioning of such public building or facility which is:is any of the following:
(1) One to which the public or a portion of the public has access and is owned or
controlled by the State, any subdivision of the State, any other public agency,
or any private institution or agency of a charitable, educational, or
eleemosynary nature; orphilanthropic nature.
(2) Dedicated to the use of the general public for a purpose which is primarily
concerned with public recreation, cultural activities, and other events of a
public nature or character.
(3) Designated by the Director of the State Bureau of Investigation in accordance
with G.S. 143B-987.
(4) One temporarily in use as a voting place under Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes during the hours for voting.
The term "building or facility" as used in this section also includes the surrounding grounds and
premises of any building or facility used in connection with the operation or functioning of such
building or facility.
*H967-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) Unless the conduct is covered under some other provision of law providing greater
punishment, any person who violates any provision of this section is guilty of a Class 2
misdemeanor."
SECTION 2. G.S. 163-166.4(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Area for Election-Related Activity. – Except as provided in subsection (c) of this
section, the county board of elections shall also provide an area adjacent to the buffer zone for
each voting place in which persons or groups of persons may distribute campaign literature, place
political advertising, solicit votes, or otherwise engage in election-related activity. It shall be a
Class 3 misdemeanor for a person to steal, deface, vandalize, or unlawfully remove political
advertising that is lawfully placed under this subsection."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 967-First Edition